Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-805
Public agencies; submission of agreements for approval; when.

In the event that an agreement made pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act deals in whole or in part with the provision of services or facilities with regard to which an officer or agency of the state government has constitutional or statutory powers of control, the agreement shall, as a condition precedent to its entry into force, be submitted to the state officer or agency having such power of control and shall be approved or disapproved by the officer or agency as to all matters within the officer's or agency's jurisdiction.

Laws 1963, c. 333, § 5, p. 1073;

Laws 1975, LB 104, § 10;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 23-2205;

Laws 1991, LB 731, § 5.